Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-770
Section of statutes; not correlated;
not reconcilable; Revisor of Statutes; duties.

When one section
of the statutes is amended in two or more bills in the same session of the
Legislature and has not been correlated as a part of the normal legislative
process and the amendments are not entirely reconcilable and are in conflict
with each other, it shall be the duty of the Revisor of Statutes to cause
only the latest version to pass the Legislature to be published in the statutory
supplement followed by a brief note explaining the action taken. The Revisor
of Statutes shall report electronically each
such case to the chairperson of the appropriate
standing committee at or prior to the convening of the next regular session
of the Legislature for whatever action may be appropriate.

Laws 1979, LB 70, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 68.